North Dakota statutes. TITLE 37 Military
CHAPTER 37-12.1 State Defense Force

37-12.1-01.
Plans for a state defense force.

The governor shall develop and maintain plans for the establishment of a state defense force.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 389, § 1.

37-12.1-02.
Establishment of a state defense force.

The governor may, by proclamation, establish a state defense force in the event that more than one-half of the units of the North Dakota national guard are called to active federal service and may in advance of such call establish a cadre of such defense force.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 389, § 1.

37-12.1-03.
Governor to adopt rules governing a state defense force.

If the governor establishes a state defense force, the governor shall adopt rules governing, among other things, the appointment of officers, enlistments, organization of units, equipment, administration, training, pay, and discipline. The rules must, to the extent practicable, conform to the rules governing the North Dakota national guard. The provisions of chapter 28-32 do not apply to the rules required by this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 389, § 1.

37-12.1-04.
Maintenance of a state defense force.

The governor may enter agreements with the United States for funds, equipment, supplies, training, and other items necessary for the proper maintenance of a state defense force. The governor may also provide, or arrange for, facilities necessary for a state defense force, including public buildings.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 389, § 1.

37-12.1-05.
Laws governing a state defense force.

The provisions of this title governing the North Dakota national guard apply to the extent practicable, to a state defense force when established pursuant to this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 389, § 1.

Cross-References.

Privilege from arrest, see N.D. Const., art. XI, § 21.